District of Columbia statutes.
44-106.02

Resident agreements.

(a)

A written contract must be provided to the resident prior to admission and signed by the resident or surrogate, if necessary, and a representative of the ALR. The nonfinancial portions of the contract shall include the following:

(1)

The ALR’s organizational affiliations (including parent or subsidiary organizations, religious or charitable affiliation, and management company);

(2)

The specific nature of any special care that it holds itself out to provide, such as specialty in Alzheimer’s disease or Parkinson’s disease;

(3)

An identification of services to be included and excluded, part of which is the ISP;

(4)

A list of resident rights including grievance procedures;

(5)

Unit assignment and procedures if changes occur;

(6)

Admission and discharge policies which include clear and specific criteria for admission, transfer, and discharge;

(7)

A description of responsibility for provision or coordination of healthcare, if any;

(8)

An arrangement for notification in case of the resident’s death; and

(9)

A disposition of the resident’s property upon discharge, transfer, or death of the resident.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 602, 47 DCR 2647
This section is referenced in § 44-106.03.